Hawaii, session 2025, GM1349.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 SECTION 1. Act 67, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023, section 3,
2 is amended by amending subsection (f) to read as follows:
3 "(f) The task force shall submit an interim report on the
4 status of its comprehensive strategic plan, including findings,
5 recommendations, and any proposed legislation, to the
6 legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of
7 each of the regular [-seseareft] sessions of 2024 [—] , 2025, 2026,
8 2 02 7 j 202^^anb 2£2 9^ The task force shall submit a final
9 report of its comprehensive strategic plan, including findings,
10 recommendations, and any proposed legislation, to the
11 legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of
12 the regular session of [2025.] 2030."
13 SECTION 2. Act 67, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023, is amended
14 by amending section 5 to read as follows:
15 "SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2023, and
16 shall be repealed on June 30, 2030."
2025-2741 SB222 CDl SMA.docx 1
imnimiiiiiiioiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 2 S.B. NO. “i
C.D. 1
1 SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
2 and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
3 SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval;
4 provided that section 2 shall take effect on June 29, 2025.
2025-2741 SB222 CDl SMA.docx 2
■BIIHIHiliilllllllliigi

S.B. NO. Bl
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 30th day of June ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 222, S.D. 1, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
13

SB No. 222, SD 1,HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
--------
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives